lt-LT: Elektronika > Tinklai > Tinklo plokštės ir adapteriai: Bluetooth tinklo adapteriai; Eterneto plokštės ir adapteriai; Elektros linijos tinklo adapteriai; Wi‑Fi tinklo plokštės ir adapteriai
nb: Elektronikk > Nettverk > Nettverkskort og adaptere: Bluetooth-nettverksadaptere; Ethernet-kort og -adaptere; Powerline-nettverksadaptere; Wifi-nettverkskort og -adaptere
hu: Elektronika > Hálózatépítés > Hálózati kártyák és adapterek: Bluetooth-hálózati adapterek; Ethernet-kártyák és -adapterek; Elektromos hálózati adapterek; Wi-Fi-hálózati kártyák és -adapterek
ko: 전자기기 > 네트워킹 > 네트워크 카드/어댑터: 블루투스 네트워크 어댑터; 이더넷 카드 및 어댑터; 전력선 네트워크 어댑터; Wi-Fi 네트워크 카드 및 어댑터
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 網路 > 網路介面卡: 藍牙網路適配器; 乙太網卡及適配器; 電力線網路適配器; WiFi 網路卡及適配器
pl: Elektronika > Sieci > Karty i adaptery sieciowe: Adaptery sieciowe Bluetooth; Karty i adaptery Ethernet; Adaptery sieciowe Powerline; Karty i adaptery sieciowe Wi-Fi
ro-RO: Electronice > Rețele > Carduri și adaptoare de rețea: Adaptoare de rețea Bluetooth; Plăci și adaptoare Ethernet; Adaptoare de rețea powerline; Plăci și adaptoare de rețea Wi-Fi
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Rede > Cartões de rede e adaptadores: Adaptadores de rede Bluetooth; Placas e adaptadores Ethernet; Adaptadores de rede powerline; Placas e adaptadores de rede WiFi
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Nối mạng > Thiết bị chuyển đổi & cạc mạng: Bộ chuyển đổi mạng Bluetooth; Thẻ và bộ chuyển đổi Ethernet; Bộ chuyển đổi mạng powerline; Thẻ và bộ chuyển đổi Wi-Fi
tr: Elektronik > Ağ Sistemleri > Ağ Kartları ve Adaptörleri: Bluetooth Ağ Adaptörleri; Ethernet Kartları ve Adaptörleri; Powerline Ağ Adaptörleri; Wi-Fi Ağ Kartları ve Adaptörleri
nl: Elektronica > Netwerken > Netwerkkaarten en -adapters: Bluetooth netwerkadapters; Ethernetkaarten en adapters; Powerline netwerkadapters; Wifi-netwerkkaarten en adapters
cs: Elektronika > Sítě > Síťové karty a adaptéry: Bluetooth síťové adaptéry; Ethernetové karty a adaptéry; Powerline síťové adaptéry; Wi-Fi síťové karty a adaptéry
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Δικτύωση > Κάρτες δικτύου & προσαρμογείς: Προσαρμογείς δικτύου Bluetooth; Κάρτες & προσαρμογείς Ethernet; Προσαρμογείς δικτύου Powerline; Κάρτες & προσαρμογείς δικτύου Wi-Fi
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 网络 > 网卡/网络适配器: 蓝牙网络适配器; 以太网卡和适配器; 电力线网络适配器; Wi-Fi 网卡和适配器
da: Elektronik > Netværk > Netværkskort og -adaptere: Bluetooth-netværksadaptere; Ethernet-kort og -adaptere; Strømstik-netværksadaptere; Wi-Fi-netværkskort og -adaptere
sv: Elektronik > Nätverk > Nätverkskort och adaptrar: Bluetooth-nätverksadaptrar; Ethernet-kort och -adaptrar; Powerline-nätverksadaptrar; Wi‑Fi-nätverkskort och -adaptrar
ja: 電子機器 > ネットワーク > ネットワークカード・アダプター: Bluetoothアダプター; イーサネットカードとアダプター; 電力線通信アダプター（PLC）; Wi-Fiアダプター（無線LAN子機）
es: Electrónica > Redes > Adaptadores y tarjetas de red: Adaptadores de red Bluetooth; Tarjetas y adaptadores Ethernet; Adaptadores de red por línea eléctrica; Tarjetas y adaptadores de red Wi-Fi
hr-HR: Elektronika > Umrežavanje > Mrežne kartice i adapteri: Bluetooth mrežni adapteri; Ethernet kartice i adapteri; Powerline mrežni adapteri; Mrežne kartice i adapteri za Wi-Fi
bg-BG: Електроника > Мрежово оборудване > Мрежови карти и адаптери: Bluetooth мрежови адаптери; Ethernet карти и адаптери; Powerline мрежови адаптери; Wi-Fi мрежови карти и адаптери
ru: Электроника > Сетевое оборудование > Сетевые карты и адаптеры: Сетевые адаптеры Bluetooth; Карты и адаптеры Ethernet; Сетевые адаптеры Powerline; Сетевые карты и адаптеры Wi-Fi
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > ระบบเครือข่าย > การ์ดและอะแดปเตอร์เครือข่าย: อะแดปเตอร์เครือข่าย Bluetooth; การ์ดและอะแดปเตอร์ Ethernet; อะแดปเตอร์เครือข่ายผ่านสายไฟ; การ์ดเครือข่ายและอะแดปเตอร์ไวไฟ
de: Elektronik > Netzwerktechnik > Netzwerkkarten: Bluetooth-Netzwerkadapter; Ethernet-Karten und -Adapter; Powerline-Netzwerkadapter; Wi-Fi-Netzwerkkarten und -Adapter
en: Electronics > Networking > Network Cards & Adapters: Bluetooth Network Adapters; Ethernet Cards & Adapters; Powerline Network Adapters; Wi-Fi Network Cards & Adapters
fr: Appareil électronique > Réseaux > Cartes réseau et adaptateurs: Adaptateurs réseau Bluetooth; Cartes et adaptateurs Ethernet; Adaptateurs CPL; Cartes et adaptateurs réseau Wi-Fi
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Ligação em rede > Cartões de rede e adaptadores: Adaptadores de rede Bluetooth; Placas e adaptadores ethernet; Adaptadores de rede powerline; Placas e adaptadores de rede Wi-Fi
it: Elettronica > Rete > Schede e adattatori di rete: Adattatori di rete Bluetooth; Schede e adattatori ethernet; Adattatori di rete per linea elettrica; Schede e adattatori di rete Wi-Fi
sl-SI: Elektronika > Mreženje > Omrežne kartice in adapterji: Bluetooth omrežni adapterji; Ethernet kartice in adapterji; Omrežni adapterji preko električnega omrežja; Wi‑Fi omrežne kartice in adapterji
fi: Elektroniikka > Verkkojen toteutus > Verkkokortit ja -muuntimet: Bluetooth-verkkosovitin; Ethernet-kortti ja sovitin; Sähköverkkosovitin; Wi-Fi-verkkokortti ja sovitin
sk-SK: Elektronika > Siete > Sieťové karty a adaptéry: Bluetooth sieťové adaptéry; Ethernetové karty a adaptéry; Powerline sieťové adaptéry; Wi‑Fi sieťové karty a adaptéry